Utah statutes.
32B-2-203.   Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control created.

(1)  There is created the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.  The department is governed by the commission.

(2)  The director of alcoholic beverage control appointed under Section 32B-2-205 shall administer the department.

(3)  The director shall allocate the duties within the department into the divisions, bureaus, sections, offices, and committees as the director considers necessary for the administration of this title.

(4)  The department shall cooperate with any other recognized agency in the administration of this title and in the enforcement of a policy or rule of the commission or policy of the director.

